Utah statutes.
69-1-3.   Transmitting agreements for payment of money -- Burden of proof.
Checks, due bills, promissory notes, bills of exchange and all orders or
agreements for the payment or delivery of money or other thing of value may be
made or drawn by telegraph, and when so made or drawn shall have the same
force and effect to charge the maker, drawer, endorser or acceptor thereof,
and shall create the same rights and equities in favor of the payee, drawee,
endorsee, acceptor, holder or bearer thereof, as if duly made or drawn and
delivered in writing. Except as provided in Section 69-1-4, whenever the
genuineness or execution of any such instrument received by telegraph shall be
denied on oath by or on behalf of the person sought to be charged thereby it
shall be incumbent upon the party claiming under or alleging the existence of
the same to prove the existence and execution of the original writing from
which the telegraphic copy was transmitted. The original message shall in all
cases be preserved in the telegraph office from which the same is sent.
